Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 4

Directors and Officers

45-2-401. Directors and officers — Qualifications of directors — Election — Terms.

The affairs of a state bank must be managed by a board of directors, which shall exercise its powers and be responsible for the discharge of its duties.

The charter or bylaws may establish a variable range for the size of the board of directors by fixing a minimum of not less than five (5) members and a maximum of not more than twenty-five (25) members. If a variable range is established, then the number of directors may be fixed or changed from time to time, within the minimum and maximum, by the shareholders or the board of directors; however, unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, only the shareholders may change the range for the size of the board or change from a fixed to a variable-range size board or vice versa.

Each bank director must, during each director's whole term of service, be a citizen of the United States.

A majority of the directors must reside in a state in which the bank has a branch location or within one hundred (100) miles of the location of any branch, for at least one (1) year immediately preceding their election and during their term of service as a director. However, the commissioner may waive the residency requirement of this subdivision (a)(4) if the commissioner finds that:

The business experience and ability of each proposed director is relevant to the bank, its market, and the type of services the bank provides or intends to provide; and

The waiver of the residency requirement will support the safety and soundness of the bank.

The bylaws of the bank may specify other qualifications for directors.

Any director who becomes disqualified shall resign the office, but, upon removal of the disqualification, is eligible for election. The board of directors or the commissioner may remove a director who is disqualified. An action taken by a director prior to resignation or removal is not subject to attack on the ground of the director's disqualification.

Except in cases of disqualification, directors shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified.

Directors shall be elected by the stockholders at the first meeting and thereafter at the annual meeting or at a special meeting called for the purpose. If the charter provides for cumulative voting, the votes of each share may be cast for one (1) person or divided among two (2) or more, as the stockholders may choose. The person or persons (to the number of directors to be elected) having the largest number of votes shall be elected.

The term of office of directors shall be one (1) year or, if the bylaws so provide, three (3) years, in which case one-third (1/3) of the directors, or as nearly one-third (1/3) as possible, shall be elected for each year following the first election of directors. Vacancies at any one time to the number of one-third (1/3) of the board may be filled by vote of the board of directors until the next meeting of the stockholders.

The officers designated by the bylaws shall be elected by the board of directors. The bank shall have only one (1) officer designated as president and the president shall be a member of the board of directors. No officer shall be elected or a contract executed for employment for a period longer than three (3) years. An officer may be removed by the board of directors at any time but removal shall not prejudice any rights that the officer may have to damages for breach of contract of employment.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.315); 1971, ch. 77, § 1; 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-226; Acts 1989, ch. 57, § 1; 1994, ch. 551, § 10; 1996, ch. 768, §§ 15, 16; 2001, ch. 54, § 11; 2020, ch. 605, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment reorganized (a) as (a)(1)–(a)(6); substituted “must” for “shall” in present (a)(1); inserted “then” in the second sentence of present (a)(2); in present (a)(4), deleted “both” preceding “for at least”, added the second sentence, and added (a)(4)(A) and (a)(4)(B); and rewrote the former last three sentences of (a) as present (a)(6), which read: “Any director who becomes disqualified shall forthwith resign the office, but, upon removal of the disqualification, shall be eligible for election. A director who is disqualified may be removed by the board of directors or by the commissioner. No action taken by a director prior to resignation or removal shall be subject to attack on the ground of the director's disqualification.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 605, § 10. March 20, 2020.

Cross-References. Bank deposits and collections, title 47, ch. 4.

Funds transfers, title 47, ch. 4A.

Letters of credit, title 47, ch. 5.

Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, §§ 15, 19.

Law Reviews.

A Realistic Duty of Care for Outside Bank Directors, 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 569 (1984).

45-2-402. Directors — Meetings and duties — Examinations and reviews — Fiduciary powers.

The board of directors shall meet at least quarterly. The commissioner, one-third (1/3) of the directors, or any two (2) executive officers may call a special meeting. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum. The board shall keep minutes of each meeting, including a record of attendance and of all votes cast by each director.

The board, or an executive committee appointed by the board, shall review periodically, in a manner satisfactory to the commissioner, the lending and investment transactions occurring since the last review.

The board shall cause a review, at least once in each calendar year at intervals of not more than fifteen (15) months, of all the affairs of the state bank, including the character and value of investments, loans, the efficiency of operating procedures, and any other matters as the commissioner may prescribe, with the review discussed and recorded in the minutes. Compliance with the external auditing requirements of the federal regulatory agencies shall be deemed as compliance with this subsection (c). However, the commissioner may require, at the commissioner's discretion, any state bank to obtain a financial statement audit or balance sheet audit should conditions warrant that action.

A state bank authorized to exercise trust powers shall not accept or voluntarily relinquish a fiduciary account without the approval or ratification of the board or of a committee of officers or directors designated by the board to perform this function, but the board or the committee may prescribe general rules governing acceptance or relinquishment of fiduciary accounts, and action taken by an officer in accordance with these rules is sufficient approval. Any committee so designated shall keep minutes of its meetings and report at each meeting of the board all action taken since the previous meeting of the board. The board shall designate one (1) or more committees to supervise the investment of fiduciary funds. The investment shall not be made, retained or disposed of without the approval of a committee. At least once in every calendar year, at intervals of not more than fifteen (15) months, the committee shall review all the assets of each fiduciary account and shall determine their current value, safety and suitability and whether the investments should be modified or retained. The committee shall keep minutes of its meetings and shall report at each meeting of the board its conclusions on all questions considered and all action taken since the previous meeting of the board.

The board of a state trust company is responsible for the proper exercise of fiduciary powers by the state trust company and each matter pertinent to the exercise of fiduciary powers, including, but not limited to:

The determination of policies;

The investment and disposition of property held in a fiduciary capacity; and

The direction and review of the actions of each officer, employee, and committee used by the state trust company in the exercise of its fiduciary powers.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.316); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-227; Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 6; 2001, ch. 54, § 12.

Law Reviews.

Residential Mortgage Lending: Charting a Course Through the Regulatory Maze, 29 Vand. L. Rev. 957.

45-2-403. Fidelity bonds and other insurance — Special reserve fund.

The directors of a state bank shall direct and require good and sufficient fidelity bonds on all active officers and employees, whether or not they draw salary or compensation, which bonds shall provide for indemnity to the bank on account of any losses sustained by it as the result of any dishonest, fraudulent or criminal act or omission committed or omitted by them acting independently or in collusion or combination with any person or persons. The bonds may be in individual, schedule or blanket form, and the premiums for the bonds may be paid by the bank.

The directors shall also direct and require suitable insurance protection to the bank against burglary, robbery, theft, liability and other similar insurable hazards to which the bank may be exposed in the operations of its business on the premises or elsewhere.

The directors shall be responsible for prescribing at least once in each year the amount of penal sum of the bonds or policies and the sureties or underwriters thereon, after giving due and careful consideration to all known elements and factors constituting the risk or hazard. The action shall be recorded in the minutes of the board of directors and be subject to the approval of the commissioner.

In lieu of providing a good and sufficient fidelity bond on all active officers and employees as required by subsection (a), a state bank with sufficient capital to assets ratio as established by the commissioner may establish a special reserve fund in such form, amount, and including such assets, as approved by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall promulgate necessary rules and regulations to implement subdivision (d)(1).

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.317); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-228; Acts 1986, ch. 865, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The Nuts and Bolts of a Fidelity Bond Claim, 27 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1991).

45-2-404. Authority to declare dividends.

The board of directors of a state bank may not declare dividends in any calendar year that exceeds the total of its net income of that year combined with its retained net income of the preceding two (2) years without the prior approval of the commissioner.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.318); T.C.A., § 45-229; Acts 2001, ch. 54, § 13.

Cross-References. Applicability to industrial banks, §45-5-607.

Law Reviews.

Section I: Symposium - Rethinking The U.S. Regulatory Structure Governing Financial Institutions: 21st Century Solutions For a 21st Century Marketplace: When the Government Becomes a Stockholder: Impact of the Capital Purchase Program on Bank Regulation (Jackie Prester), 39 U. Mem. L. Rev. 931 (2009).

45-2-405. Government service.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any officer, director, or employee of any bank may serve in any capacity in state or local government, except in any capacity with the department, or on any board, commission, or other agency of the governmental unit; provided, that the officer, director or employee has:

Disclosed to the chief executive officer of the bank and the board of directors of the bank the capacity in which the officer, director or employee is serving with the governmental unit; and

Disclosed to the chief executive officer of the governmental unit and to the appropriate board, commission or other agency the relationship to the bank.

Where there has been compliance with this section, the existence of the dual relationship shall not invalidate, or adversely affect, any sale, contract or other business transaction between the bank and the governmental unit.

As used in this section, “bank” means any state or national bank, or state or federal savings and loan association, or credit union established pursuant to chapter 4 of this title.

Acts 1983, ch. 287, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §45-2-405 authorizes any officer, director, or employee of any bank to serve in any local office, including on the county commission, the county budget committee, or the county purchasing commission, so long as he or she discloses the position to the bank and the local government, OAG 07-141, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 141 (10/10/07).